Utah statutes.
62A-11-320.7.   Three-year notice of opportunity to review.

(1)  Once every three years, the office shall give notice to each parent or legal guardian involved in a case receiving IV-D services of the opportunity to request a review and, if appropriate, adjustment of a child support order under Sections 62A-11-320.5 and 62A-11-320.6.

(2) (a)  The notice required by Subsection (1) may be included in an issued or modified order of support.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the office shall comply with Subsection (1), three years after the date of the order issued or modified under Subsection (2)(a).

